Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.742

Single enrollment requirement.

Beginning with the 2022 plan year, individuals are limited to a single enrollment in medical, dental, and vision plans in either the school employees' benefits board or the public employees' benefits board. The school employees' benefits board and the public employees' benefits board shall adopt policies to reflect this single enrollment requirement.

[ 2021 c 18 s 1; 2020 c 8 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 8: See note following RCW 41.05.744.